Hawaii statutes.
[§672E-7] Mediation. If the parties
are unable to resolve the claim pursuant to section 672E‑5 or 672E‑6,
all parties shall attempt to resolve the dispute through mediation, even if
mediation is not otherwise ordered or mandated by contract or by law. [L 2004,
c 119, pt of §2]

Previous
Vol13_Ch0601-0676
Next